Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.255

Child support.

In entering or modifying an order under this chapter, the court may order one or more parents of the child to pay an amount reasonable or necessary for the child's support pursuant to chapter 26.19 RCW.

[ 2019 c 437 s 215.]